Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1655
Fees.

(1) The application for approval of construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of a dam shall be accompanied by a filing fee as established by rule and regulation of the Chief Water Officer but not to exceed (a) two hundred dollars for a dam less than twenty-five feet in height, (b) three hundred dollars for a dam twenty-five feet in height to not more than fifty feet in height, and (c) four hundred dollars for a dam in excess of fifty feet in height.

(2) Only one filing fee shall be collected for an enlargement by flashboards, sandbags, earthen levees, gates, or other works, devices, or obstructions which are from time to time to be removed and replaced or opened and shut and thereby operated so as to vary the surface elevation of the reservoir.

(3) A dam subject to the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act and for which plans and specifications have been approved prior to September 4, 2005, shall not be required to pay any additional fee or submit an additional application for approval unless such dam requires reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment.

(4) An application shall not be considered by the Chief Water Officer until the filing fee is received.

(5) Fees collected by the department under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Dam Safety Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 55;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 293.